apertium-cux.cux.twol
Alphabet

a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z ñ ' 

%{i%}:i %{i%}:0
%{I%}:i
%{h%}:h %{h%}:k
%{e%}:e %{e%}:0
%{a%}:a %{a%}:0
%{u%}:u 
%{ː%}:a %{ː%}:u %{ː%}:i %{ː%}:o %{ː%}:e
%{˦%}:́
%{˨%}:0

%>:%>

;

Sets

Vow = a e i o u ;

Back = a o ;

Rules

"Lengthening"
%{ː%}:Vx <=> Vx %>: _ ; 
       where Vx in ( a e i o u ) ;

!@ j:j {i}:0 >:0 a:a {ː}:a {˦}:́

"Morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ; 

"Irrealis {a}-"
%{a%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{I%}: ;

"Irrealis -{e}"
%{e%}:0 <=> %{a%}: %>: _ ; 

"Continuo"
%{i%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{I%}: ;
            _ %>: %{e%}: ;
            _ %>: Vow ; 

"Irrealis {u}"
%{u%}:0 <=> _ :a ; 
            _ :e ; 
            _ :o ; 

"Continuo j{i}- + {I}-"
j:0 <=> _ %{i%}:0 %>: %{I%}:i ;

! j:0 {i}:0 >:0 {I}:i n u >:0 s

"Completivo V (I)" 
%{h%}:k <=> _ %>: :Back ; 

"Completivo V (II)"
c:0 <=> _ :k ; 
